Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs Veteran Services Grant Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Veteran Services Grant Fund shall be cred-
ited to the fund. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs Veteran  Services Grant Fund shall
consist of moneys transferred  to the fund from the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Af-
fairs Dedicated Lottery  Fund established under section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled Senate Bill 140). Moneys in the Department of Veterans’  Affairs Veteran Services
Grant Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs  for the
purposes established under this section.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may award grants in the amount  of $25,000 to
$250,000 per  recipient from the Department of Veterans’ Affairs Veteran Services Grant
Fund for the following purposes:
(a) Expanding outreach to veterans;
(b) Expanding services for veterans;
(c) Promoting improved mental health care for veterans;
(d) Promoting improved physical health care for veterans;
(e) Promoting housing security for veterans;
(f) Promoting employment opportunities and stability for veterans;
(g) Promoting education and training opportunities for veterans;
(h) Promoting transportation accessibility and availability for veterans;
(i) Promoting veterans’ organizations that provide critical services for veterans within
a community or region or on a statewide basis; and
(j) Supporting existing programs identified by the  Advisory Committee appointed under
ORS 406.210 in accordance with Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) The  department, with the advice of the Advisory Committee, shall adopt rules neces-
sary to carry out  the provisions of this section. The rules shall include, but are not limited
to, requirements for eligibility for grants from the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Veteran
Services Grant Fund.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $555,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the veterans’ services fund created under
Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution, to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs
Enrolled House Bill 2891 (HB 2891-B) Page 1
for the purpose of making and  administering grants from the Department of Veterans’ Af-
fairs Veteran Services Grant Fund established under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2891 (HB 2891-B) Page 2